New Mexico, session 2026, HB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the children, youth and families department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to provide statewide support and family affirmation services to lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer families and education and outreach services to lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer persons and families to consider foster parenting and adoption. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -